Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 2. Hunting and Trapping.
§ 29.1-530.1.
Solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink clothing required at certain times.

For the purposes of this section, “solid blaze orange” means a safety orange or fluorescent orange hue and “solid blaze pink” means a safety pink or fluorescent pink hue.

During any firearms deer season, except during the special season for hunting deer with a muzzle-loading rifle only, in counties and cities designated by the Board, every hunter and every person accompanying a hunter shall (i) wear a solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink hat, except that the bill or brim of the hat may be a color or design other than solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink, or solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink upper body clothing that is visible from 360 degrees, (ii) display at least 100 square inches of solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink material at shoulder level within body reach visible from 360 degrees, or (iii) when hunting from an enclosed ground blind, display at least 100 square inches of solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink material visible from 360 degrees attached to or immediately above a blind.

During the special season for hunting deer with a muzzle-loading rifle only, in counties and cities designated by the Board, every muzzleloader deer hunter and every person accompanying a muzzleloader deer hunter shall wear (i) a solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink hat, except that the bill or brim of the hat may be a color or design other than solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink, or (ii) solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink upper body clothing, either of which shall be visible from 360 degrees, unless such person is physically located in a tree stand or other stationary hunting location.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, pay a fine of $25.

Violations of this section shall not be admissible in any civil action for personal injury or death as evidence of negligence, contributory negligence, or assumption of the risk.

This section shall not apply when (i) hunting waterfowl from stationary or floating blinds, (ii) hunting waterfowl over decoys, (iii) hunting waterfowl in wetlands as defined in §

28.2-1300

, (iv) hunting waterfowl from a boat or other floating conveyance, (v) hunting doves, (vi) participating in hunting dog field trials permitted by the Board, (vii) on horseback while hunting foxes with hounds but without firearms, or (viii) hunting with a bow and arrow in areas where the discharge of firearms is prohibited by state law or local ordinance.

History.

1987, c. 319, § 29-147.2; 1988, cc. 474, 715; 2002, c. 39; 2005, c. 167; 2009, c. 11; 2014, c. 140; 2017, c. 347; 2018, c. 151; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1987, c. 319, as § 29-147.2. Pursuant to § 30-152, this section has been incorporated into Title 29.1 as §

29.1-530.1

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 39 inserted “except that the bill or brim of the hat may be a color or design other than solid blaze orange” near the middle of the first sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 167 added clause (vii) at the end of the last paragraph and made minor stylistic and related changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 11, in the last paragraph, inserted clause (v) and redesignated former clauses (v) through (vii) as clauses (vi) through (viii).

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 140, in the first paragraph, substituted “and every” for “or any”; added the second paragraph; and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 347 inserted the subsection designations; inserted “or blaze pink” following “blaze orange” throughout; in subsection A, inserted clause (i) and (ii) designations; and in subsection B, inserted clause (i) and (ii) designations, substituted “either of which shall be” for “that is” and “unless” for “except when any” in clause (ii).

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 151 inserted “solid” preceding “blaze” throughout; added subsection A, redesignated former subsections A through E as B through F; in subsection B, added “or (iii) when hunting from an enclosed ground blind, display at least 100 square inches of solid blaze orange or solid blaze pink material visible from 360 degrees attached to or immediately above a blind” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection F at the end of clause (vi).

§ 29.1-530.2.
Unlawfully killing bear; penalty.

Any person who kills or attempts to kill a bear in violation of any provision of this article or any regulation adopted thereunder is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and may also be prohibited by the court from hunting, trapping, or fishing in the Commonwealth for a period of one to five years.

History.

1988, c. 19; 2020, c. 311.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 311 added “and may also be prohibited by the court from hunting, trapping, or fishing in the Commonwealth for a period of one to five years” and made stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-530.3.
Remote hunting prohibited; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting or provide or operate a facility that allows others to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting if the wild animal or wild bird being hunted or shot is located in the Commonwealth.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. In addition to the penalty prescribed herein, the court shall revoke all current hunting licenses and privileges of the person convicted of violating this section and prohibit that person from hunting for a period of one to five years. Notification of the revocation or prohibition shall be forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsections C and D of §

18.2-56.1

.

For the purposes of this section “computer-assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or other device, equipment, or software, to remotely control the aiming and discharge of a firearm or other weapon, that allows a person, not physically present, to hunt or shoot any wild animal or wild bird.

History.

2005, cc. 172, 226; 2010, c. 183.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183, in subsection B, substituted “license and privileges” for “license, if any” and “that person from hunting for a period of one to five years” for “the issuance of any hunting license to that person for a period of not less than three nor more than five years.”

§ 29.1-530.4.
Duty of certain entities to report hunting incidents.

Any law-enforcement agency or emergency medical services provider that receives a report that a person engaged in hunting as defined in §

29.1-100

has suffered serious bodily injury or death shall immediately give notice of the incident to the Department.

History.

2005, c. 688; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2020, c. 958.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2005 act having been §

29.1-530.3

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “services” for “service” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” at the end.